dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="h__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>h</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gupp/y__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yn</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yer</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ysar</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ier</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ysarna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iesarna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yerna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ierna</l><r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kärande__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kam/mare__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mare</l><r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>maren</l><r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mare</l><r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deliri/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="böv/el__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>larna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eln</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>elen</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lar</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="niell/o__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="asyndeton__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trim__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>men</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>met</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ar__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>äder</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äderna</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ader</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adern</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fe__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="minut__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pandemonium"><i>pandemoni</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="biktfar"><i>biktf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="krigsindustri"><i>krigsindustri</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="policy"><i>polic</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="LO-ordförande"><i>LO-ordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="daghavande"><i>daghavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dimkammare"><i>dimkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="atrofi"><i>atrofi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ordförande"><i>ordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="spiskammare"><i>spiskam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="delirium"><i>deliri</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="underhavande"><i>underhavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="energiteori"><i>energiteori</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="asylsökande"><i>asylsökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stångjärnshammare"><i>stångjärnsham</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="minut"><i>minut</i><par n="minut__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bövel"><i>böv</i><par n="böv/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="föredragande"><i>föredragande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dummy"><i>dumm</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kakafoni"><i>kakafoni</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ponny"><i>ponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="trim"><i>trim</i><par n="trim__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="hobby"><i>hobb</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skattkammare"><i>skattkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="självbiografi"><i>självbiografi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="befallningshavande"><i>befallningshavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="barnafar"><i>barnaf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="drätselkammare"><i>drätselkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="husfar"><i>husf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="idiosynkrasi"><i>idiosynkrasi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="forskningsresande"><i>forskningsresande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="psykoterapi"><i>psykoterapi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="morfar"><i>morf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gaskammare"><i>gaskam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skoldirektör"><i>skoldirektör</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="klimakterium"><i>klimakteri</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="guppy"><i>gupp</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="studerande"><i>studerande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fallhammare"><i>fallham</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="impressario"><i>impressari</i><par n="niell/o__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gudfar"><i>gudf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hundallergi"><i>hundallergi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="styvfar"><i>styvf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="upptäcktsresande"><i>upptäcktsresande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="shetlandsponny"><i>shetlandsponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="asyndeton"><i>asyndeton</i><par n="asyndeton__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="farfarsfar"><i>farfarsf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dandy"><i>dand</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="civilingenjör"><i>civilingenjör</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="perihelium"><i>periheli</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="h"><i>h</i><par n="h__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Metallordförande"><i>Metallordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="alkoholpolicy"><i>alkoholpolic</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stamfar"><i>stamf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="distansminut"><i>distansminut</i><par n="minut__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="svärfar"><i>svärf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="rustkammare"><i>rustkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="niello"><i>niell</i><par n="niell/o__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gravkammare"><i>gravkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="farfar"><i>farf</i><par n="f/ar__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="verkstadsindustri"><i>verkstadsindustri</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sakägande"><i>sakägande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="klädkammare"><i>klädkam</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slutminut"><i>slutminut</i><par n="minut__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="purgatorium"><i>purgatori</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="drogpolicy"><i>drogpolic</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stånghammare"><i>stångham</i><par n="kam/mare__n_ut"/></e>
